tables/en-g3.ctb
# while
noback pass2 @349-456-1246-0-1349-23 @349-456-1246-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @349-456-1246-0-2349-36 @349-456-1246-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @349-456-1246-0-1349-25 @349-456-1246-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @349-456-1246-0-1349-256 @349-456-1246-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @349-456-1246-0-12349 @349-456-1246-0-12349
noback pass2 @349-456-1246-0-239 @349-456-1246-0-239
noback pass2 @349-456-1246-0 @349-456-1246
noback pass2 @349-456-1246-0-3456 @349-456-1246-0-3456

# willing
noback pass2 @349-4-2456-0-1349-23 @349-4-2456-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @349-4-2456-0-2349-36 @349-4-2456-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @349-4-2456-0-1349-25 @349-4-2456-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @349-4-2456-0-1349-256 @349-4-2456-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @349-4-2456-0-12349 @349-4-2456-0-12349
noback pass2 @349-4-2456-0-239 @349-4-2456-0-239
noback pass2 @349-4-2456-0 @349-4-2456
noback pass2 @349-4-2456-0-3456 @349-4-2456-0-3456

# word
noback pass2 @349-45-2456-0-1349-23 @349-45-2456-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @349-45-2456-0-2349-36 @349-45-2456-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @349-45-2456-0-1349-25 @349-45-2456-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @349-45-2456-0-1349-256 @349-45-2456-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @349-45-2456-0-12349 @349-45-2456-0-12349
noback pass2 @349-45-2456-0-239 @349-45-2456-0-239
noback pass2 @349-45-2456-0 @349-45-2456
noback pass2 @349-45-2456-0-3456 @349-45-2456-0-3456

# work
noback pass2 @349-5-2456-0-1349-23 @349-5-2456-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @349-5-2456-0-2349-36 @349-5-2456-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @349-5-2456-0-1349-25 @349-5-2456-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @349-5-2456-0-1349-256 @349-5-2456-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @349-5-2456-0-12349 @349-5-2456-0-12349
noback pass2 @349-5-2456-0-239 @349-5-2456-0-239
noback pass2 @349-5-2456-0 @349-5-2456
noback pass2 @349-5-2456-0-3456 @349-5-2456-0-3456

# world
noback pass2 @349-456-2456-0-1349-23 @349-456-2456-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @349-456-2456-0-2349-36 @349-456-2456-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @349-456-2456-0-1349-25 @349-456-2456-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @349-456-2456-0-1349-256 @349-456-2456-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @349-456-2456-0-12349 @349-456-2456-0-12349
noback pass2 @349-456-2456-0-239 @349-456-2456-0-239
noback pass2 @349-456-2456-0 @349-456-2456
noback pass2 @349-456-2456-0-3456 @349-456-2456-0-3456

# write
noback pass2 @349-5-356-0-1349-23 @349-5-356-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @349-5-356-0-2349-36 @349-5-356-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @349-5-356-0-1349-25 @349-5-356-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @349-5-356-0-1349-256 @349-5-356-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @349-5-356-0-12349 @349-5-356-0-12349
noback pass2 @349-5-356-0-239 @349-5-356-0-239
noback pass2 @349-5-356-0 @349-5-356
noback pass2 @349-5-356-0-3456 @349-5-356-0-3456

# writes
noback pass2 @45-356-0-1349-23 @45-356-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @45-356-0-2349-36 @45-356-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @45-356-0-1349-25 @45-356-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @45-356-0-1349-256 @45-356-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @45-356-0-12349 @45-356-0-12349
noback pass2 @45-356-0-239 @45-356-0-239
noback pass2 @45-356-0 @45-356
noback pass2 @45-356-0-3456 @45-356-0-3456

# writing
noback pass2 @349-4-356-0-1349-23 @349-4-356-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @349-4-356-0-2349-36 @349-4-356-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @349-4-356-0-1349-25 @349-4-356-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @349-4-356-0-1349-256 @349-4-356-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @349-4-356-0-12349 @349-4-356-0-12349
noback pass2 @349-4-356-0-239 @349-4-356-0-239
noback pass2 @349-4-356-0 @349-4-356
noback pass2 @349-4-356-0-3456 @349-4-356-0-3456

# written
noback pass2 @456-356-0-1349-23 @456-356-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @456-356-0-2349-36 @456-356-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @456-356-0-1349-25 @456-356-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @456-356-0-1349-256 @456-356-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @456-356-0-12349 @456-356-0-12349
noback pass2 @456-356-0-239 @456-356-0-239
noback pass2 @456-356-0 @456-356
noback pass2 @456-356-0-3456 @456-356-0-3456

# wrote
noback pass2 @456-356-0-1349-23 @456-356-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @456-356-0-2349-36 @456-356-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @456-356-0-1349-25 @456-356-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @456-356-0-1349-256 @456-356-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @456-356-0-12349 @456-356-0-12349
noback pass2 @456-356-0-239 @456-356-0-239
noback pass2 @456-356-0 @456-356
noback pass2 @456-356-0-3456 @456-356-0-3456

noback pass3 %marker ?
include en-g3-patterns.dic
